Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Admission of Members

§ 17-20-601.
Admission.

No person who is not an incorporator shall become a member of a cooperative utility unless the person agrees to use the services furnished by the cooperative utility on a continuing basis when such services shall be available through its facilities. The bylaws may provide that any person, including an incorporator, shall cease to be [a] member of the cooperative utility if the member fails or refuses to use the services made available by the cooperative utility, or if services are not made available to the member by the cooperative utility within the specified time after the person has become a member.

The bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications and limitations in respect to membership.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-20-602.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-20-603.
Requirement of members.

A cooperative utility is required to have members.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.